Tennessee, session 114, SB2169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 14, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
8-14-115.
Effective July 1, 2026, there are created five (5) additional social worker positions
in the public defender system.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2169
012221
- 1 -